Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-716
City funds; depositories; maximum
deposits; liability of treasurer.

The treasurer shall not
have on deposit in any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying
mutual financial institution at any time more than the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation plus the maximum amount of the bond given by
the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial
institution if the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying
mutual financial institution gives a surety bond, nor in any bank, capital
stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution giving
a personal bond, more than the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation plus one-half of the amount of the bond of such bank, capital
stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution, and
the amount so on deposit any time with any such bank, capital stock financial
institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution shall not in either
case exceed the amount insured or
guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation plus the
paid-up capital stock and surplus of such bank, capital stock financial institution,
or qualifying mutual financial institution.

The city treasurer shall not be liable for any loss sustained by reason
of the failure of any such bonded depository whose bond has been duly approved
by the mayor as provided in section 16-714 or which has, in lieu of a surety
bond, given security as provided in section 16-715.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 86, p. 294;

R.S.1913, § 4982;

C.S.1922, § 4151;

C.S.1929, § 16-713;

Laws 1931, c. 28, § 1, p. 116;

Laws 1937, c. 22, § 1, p. 135;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-713;

R.S.1943, § 16-716;

Laws 1981, LB 491, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 157, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 21;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 23;

Laws 2002, LB 860, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 9.